apertium-krl.krl.lexc
LEXICON PROPN_LUMIKELLO

0 PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0 PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_KONSTANTIN

0 PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_ANU/Š

0:š PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:kše PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:š PROPN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:kši PROPN_SGPAR_E ;
0:kš   PROPN_CASES_PL_BACK ;



LEXICON PROPN_ILMAT/AR

0:ar PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:tare PROPN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:ar PROPN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:ar   PROPN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON PROPN_HII/SI

0:si  PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:je  PROPN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:t   PROPN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:s   PROPN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON PROPN_TELT/TA

0:ta  PROPN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:a  PROPN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:ta  PROPN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:tu  PROPN_SGPAR_A ;
0:o    PROPN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:to    PROPN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:to    PROPN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON PRON_MI/NÄ

0:nä  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:nu  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PRON_MI/E

0:e PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:u PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:lma  # ;

LEXICON PRON_H/IÄN

0:iän  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:än PRON_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:äne PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;


LEXICON PRON_M/YÖ

0:yö PRON_PLNOM_0 ;
0:e PRON_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON PRON_TÄ/MÄ

0:mä PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0  PRON_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:mä PRON_SGGEN_N ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:hä  # ;

LEXICON PRON_NÄ/MÄ

0:mä PRON_PLNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0  PRON_PLGEN_IJEN ;

LEXICON PRON_T/UO

0:uo  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:uo  PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_N/UO

0:uo  PRON_PLNOM_0 ;
0:oi  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_Š/E

0:e  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:en # ;
%<sg%>%<ine%>:iinä # ;
%<sg%>%<ela%>:iitä # ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:iih # ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:inne # ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:itä # ;

LEXICON PRON_N/E

0:e  PRON_PLNOM_0 ;
0:i  PRON_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:iijen # ;
%<pl%>%<ill%>:iihi # ;

LEXICON PRON_IČ/E

0:e  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e  PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:či PRON_SGPAR_E ;

LEXICON PRON_KAI/KKI

0      PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:kki  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ke   PRON_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:k    PRON_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK ;
0:kk   PRON_PLPAR_IE ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:kin # ;
%<pl%>%<com%>:kkine # ;

LEXICON PRON_KU/DAI

0:dai PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:dua PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_MOLOM/PI

0:pi  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:m   PRON_CASES_PL_WEAK_BACK ;
0:p   PRON_CASES_PL_BACK_STRONG ;
0:ma  PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_JOKAHI/NI

0:ni PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;

LEXICON PRON_KUMPA/INE

0:ine PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ise PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:is  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;

0:ni PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ne PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0:s  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:s  PRON_PLGEN_IEN ;

LEXICON PRON_KE/N

0:n PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ne PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0 PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT ;

LEXICON PRON_MI

0  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0 PRON_CASES_SG_FRONT_S ;

LEXICON PRON_KU

0 PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0  PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_JOKA

0  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;

LEXICON PRON_MON/I

0:i PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_MU/U

0:u  PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:u  PRON_CASES_SG_BACK_S ;
0:u  PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0  PRON_PLGEN_IJEN ;
0  PRON_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON PRON_TOI/NI

0:ni PRON_SGNOM_0 ;
0:se PRON_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s PRON_SGPAR_TA ;
0:s PRON_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_MÄT/ÄŠ

0:äš NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:tähä NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:täš NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:täh   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_KIN/NAŠ

0:naš NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:taha NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:naš NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:tah   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_KYNNY/Š

0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:kše NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:š NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:ks   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:ks   NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_EVÄ/Š

0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:hä NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:š NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:h   NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;
0:h   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_OMAPERÄISY/Š

0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ve NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:ön # ;
0:t NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:v   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_VIISAHU/Š

0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ve NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:on # ;
0:t NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:v   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_OIKEU/Š


0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ve NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:š NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:kši NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:kši NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:kš   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_MIELIKUVITU/Š

0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:kše NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:š NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:kši NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:kši NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:kš   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_SUALE/Š

0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:he NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:š NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:h   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_RAHVA/Š

0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ha NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:š NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:h   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:h   NOUN_PLGEN_IEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_TEH/AŠ

0:aš NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:taha NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:aš NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:tah   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:tah   NOUN_PLGEN_IEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_MIE/Š

0:š NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:he NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:š NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0:h   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:h   NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠOIT/IN

0:in NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:time NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:in  NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0:tim   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:tim   NOUN_PLGEN_IEN ;
0:tim   NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_TAIMEN

0 NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0 NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_JÄŠEN

0 NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0 NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_ISTORI/E

0:e NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:ju NOUN_SGPAR_A ;
0:jo NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_ROOL/I

0:i NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:i  NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:e  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:i  NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0  NOUN_PLGEN_IEN ;
0:ilo  NOUN_CASES_LO/I_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_PEL/I

0:i NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:i  NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:e  NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:i  NOUN_PLPAR_JÄ ;
0:ilö  NOUN_CASES_LÖ/I_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠKUAP/PI

0:pi NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_BACK ;
0:pi NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_BACK ;
0:pi  NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:p  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:pe  NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;

LEXICON NOUN_KEP/PI

0:pi NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;
0:pi NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT ;
0:pi  NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:p  NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:pe  NOUN_PLPAR_JÄ ;
0:pi  NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_ŠII/PI

0:pi NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ve NOUN_CASES_SG_WEAK_FRONT ;
0:pe NOUN_CASES_SG_STRONG_FRONT ;
0:pi  NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:v  NOUN_CASES_PL_WEAK_FRONT ;
0:p  NOUN_CASES_PL_WEAK_FRONT ;
0:pi  NOUN_PLPAR_JÄ ;
0:pi  NOUN_PLGEN_JEN ;

LEXICON NOUN_LIN/TU

0:tu NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:nu NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:tu  NOUN_SGPAR_O ;
0:nu  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:tu  NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;


LEXICON NOUN_TUN/TI

0:ti NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ni NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:ti  NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:ne  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:te  NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;

LEXICON NOUN_KÄYN/TI

0:ti NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:ni NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:ti  NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:ne  NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:te  NOUN_PLPAR_JÄ ;

LEXICON NOUN_KÄ/SI

0:si NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:te NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0:si  NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:s   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:si  NOUN_PLPAR_JÄ ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOLKLORIST/I

0:i NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:i  NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:e  NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:i  NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0    NOUN_PLGEN_IEN ;
0:ilo  NOUN_CASES_LO/I_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_LAPŠ/I

0:i   NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e   NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:i   NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0     NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:i   NOUN_PLPAR_JA ;
0:ilo  NOUN_CASES_LO/I_PL_BACK ;

LEXICON NOUN_HENK/I

0:i NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:i NOUN_SGPAR_E ;

LEXICON NOUN_PIIR/I

0:i NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:i NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0:i NOUN_SGPAR_Ä ;
0:i NOUN_SGPAR_E ;
0:ilö NOUN_CASES_LÖ/I_PL_FRONT ;

LEXICON NOUN_TUOH/I

0:i NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0   NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;

LEXICON NOUN_JUUR/I

0:i NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;
0   NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_KIEL/I

0:i NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:e NOUN_CASES_SG_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_CASES_PL_FRONT ;
0   NOUN_SGPAR_TÄ ;
0   NOUN_PLPAR_IE ;

LEXICON NOUN_VUO/ŠI

0:ši  NOUN_SGNOM_0 ;
0:te  NOUN_CASES_SG_BACK ;
0:s   NOUN_CASES_PL_BACK ;
0:t   NOUN_SGPAR_TA ;

LEXICON NOUN
ammatti#mieš%<n%>:ammatti0mie  NOUN_MIE/Š ;
aštie%<n%>:ašti  NOUN_ISTORI/E ;
ehokaš%<n%>:ehoka  NOUN_RAHVA/Š ;
kehityš%<n%>:kehity NOUN_KYNNY/Š ;
etnokulttuuri#keškuš%<n%>:etnokulttuuri0kešku NOUN_MIELIKUVITU/Š ;
eväš%<n%>:evä NOUN_EVÄ/Š ;
folkloristi%<n%>:folklorist  NOUN_FOLKLORIST/I ;
henki%<n%>:henk NOUN_HENK/I ;
ilma#piiri%<n%>:ilma0piir NOUN_PIIR/I ;
investointi%<n%>:investoint NOUN_FOLKLORIST/I ;
istorie%<n%>:istori  NOUN_ISTORI/E ;
juoni%<n%>:juon NOUN_LAPŠ/I ;
juuri%<n%>:juur NOUN_JUUR/I ;
jäšen%<n%>:jäsen NOUN_JÄŠEN ;
kanšallisuš%<n%>:kanšallisu  NOUN_VIISAHU/Š ;
kanši%<n%>:kanš NOUN_KIEL/I ;
kanta#rahvaš%<n%>:kanta0rahva  NOUN_RAHVA/Š ;
kaupunki%<n%>:kaupunk NOUN_ROOL/I ;
keppi%<n%>:kep NOUN_KEP/PI ;
kertomuš%<n%>:kertomu NOUN_MIELIKUVITU/Š ;
kieli%<n%>:kiel NOUN_KIEL/I ;
kinnaš%<n%>:kin  NOUN_KIN/NAŠ ;
kirjallisuš%<n%>:kirjallisu NOUN_VIISAHU/Š ;
kontie%<n%>:konti  NOUN_ISTORI/E ;
koulutuš%<n%>:koulutu NOUN_MIELIKUVITU/Š ;
kulttuuri%<n%>:kulttuur NOUN_FOLKLORIST/I ;
kynnyš%<n%>:kynny  NOUN_KYNNY/Š ;
kyykkäri#polvi%<n%>:kyykkäri0polv NOUN_LAPŠ/I ;
käsi%<n%>:kä NOUN_KÄ/SI ;
käynti%<n%>:käyn NOUN_KÄYN/TI ;
lento#yhteyš%<n%>:lento0yhtey NOUN_KYNNY/Š ;
liikenneh#yhteyš%<n%>:liikenneh0yhtey NOUN_OMAPERÄISY/Š ;
linjaauto#yhteyš%<n%>:linjaauto0yhtey NOUN_OMAPERÄISY/Š ;
lintu%<n%>:lin NOUN_LIN/TU ;
mahollisuš%<n%>:mahollisu NOUN_VIISAHU/Š ;
maitotehaš%<n%>:maitoteh  NOUN_TEH/AŠ ;
malli%<n%>:mall NOUN_PIIR/I ;
mielikuvituš%<n%>:mielikuvitu NOUN_MIELIKUVITU/Š ;
mieli%<n%>:miel NOUN_KIEL/I ;
mieš%<n%>:mie  NOUN_MIE/Š ;
monipuolisus%<n%>:monipuolisu  NOUN_VIISAHU/Š ;
mono#kaupunki%<n%>:mono0kaupunk NOUN_ROOL/I ;
musiikki#šoitin%<n%>:musiikki0šoit NOUN_ŠOIT/IN ;
mätäš%<n%>:mät  NOUN_MÄT/ÄŠ ;
nimi%<n%>:nim NOUN_KIEL/I ;
nuapuri%<n%>:nuapur NOUN_FOLKLORIST/I ;
nähtävyš%<n%>:nähtävy NOUN_KYNNY/Š ;
näppi%<n%>:näp NOUN_KEP/PI ;
oikeuš%<n%>:oikeu NOUN_OIKEU/Š ;
omaperäisys%<n%>:omaperäisy  NOUN_OMAPERÄISY/Š ;
pajun#taimen%<n%>:pajun0taimen NOUN_TAIMEN ;
peli%<n%>:pel NOUN_PEL/I ;
piiri%<n%>:piir NOUN_PIIR/I ;
piätöš%<n%>:piätö NOUN_KYNNY/Š ;
polvi%<n%>:polv NOUN_LAPŠ/I ;
puna#juuri%<n%>:puna0juur NOUN_JUUR/I ;
rahvaš%<n%>:rahva  NOUN_RAHVA/Š ;
rooli%<n%>:rool NOUN_ROOL/I ;
šeikkailu#peli%<n%>:šeikkailu0pel NOUN_PEL/I ;
šiipi%<n%>:šii NOUN_ŠII/PI ;
siti#keškuš%<n%>:siti0kešku NOUN_MIELIKUVITU/Š ;
škuappi%<n%>:škuap NOUN_ŠKUAP/PI ;
šointu%<n%>:šoin NOUN_LIN/TU ;
šoitin%<n%>:šoit NOUN_ŠOIT/IN ;
statussi%<n%>:statuss NOUN_LAPŠ/I ;
sualeš%<n%>:suale NOUN_SUALE/Š ;
sukši%<n%>:sukš NOUN_PIIR/I ;
šyönti%<n%>:šyön NOUN_KÄYN/TI ;
šähköpošti%<n%>:šähköpošt NOUN_FOLKLORIST/I ;
taimen%<n%>:taimen NOUN_TAIMEN ;
tanšši%<n%>:tanšš NOUN_PEL/I ;
teatteri%<n%>:teatter NOUN_PIIR/I ;
tehaš%<n%>:teh  NOUN_TEH/AŠ ;
tulovaisuš%<n%>:tulovaisu NOUN_VIISAHU/Š ;
tunti%<n%>:tun NOUN_TUN/TI ;
tunti%<n%>:tun NOUN_TUN/TI ;
tuohi%<n%>:tuoh NOUN_TUOH/I ;
ulko#puoli%<n%>:ulko0puol NOUN_LAPŠ/I ;
vesi%<n%>:ve NOUN_KÄ/SI ;
vuoši%<n%>:vuo  NOUN_VUO/ŠI ;
vähembistö#kieli%<n%>:vähembistö0kiel NOUN_KIEL/I ;
yhteyš%<n%>:yhtey NOUN_KYNNY/Š ;
LEXICON PROPN
Anuš%<np%>%<top%>:Anu PROPN_ANU/Š ;
Art-teltta%<np%>%<al%>:Art-telt  PROPN_TELT/TA ;
Aunuš%<np%>%<top%>:Aunu PROPN_ANU/Š ;
Karel’ski% okatiš%<np%>%<al%>:Karel’ski% okatiš  PROPN_KONSTANTIN ;
Hiekkaveššoš%<np%>%<top%>:Hiekkaveššo PROPN_ANU/Š ;
Hiisi%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Hii   PROPN_HII/SI ;
Hristo%<np%>%<al%>:Hristo PROPN_LUMIKELLO ;
Ilmatar%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:Ilmat  PROPN_ILMAT/AR ;
Volvo%<np%>%<al%>:Volvo PROPN_LUMIKELLO ;
Kostamuš%<np%>%<top%>:Kostamu PROPN_ANU/Š ;
Koštamuš%<np%>%<top%>:Koštamu PROPN_ANU/Š ;
Krasnodar%<np%>%<top%>:Krasnodar PROPN_KONSTANTIN ;
Mišin%<np%>%<cog%>:Mišin PROPN_KONSTANTIN ;
Nesterenko%<np%>%<cog%>:Nesterenko PROPN_LUMIKELLO ;
Pariisi%<np%>%<top%>:Parii   PROPN_HII/SI ;
Pohjoiskello%<np%>%<al%>:Pohjoiskello PROPN_LUMIKELLO ;
Prošenko%<np%>%<cog%>:Prošenko PROPN_LUMIKELLO ;
Puudož%<np%>%<top%>:Puudož PROPN_KONSTANTIN ;
Slavmo%<np%>%<al%>:Slavmo PROPN_LUMIKELLO ;
Vladimir%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:Vladimir PROPN_KONSTANTIN ;
